Utah statutes.
70C-6-108.   Charge for insurance in connection with a deferral,
refinancing, or consolidation -- Duplicate charges.
A creditor may contract for and receive a separate charge for insurance in
connection with a deferral, a refinancing, or a consolidation if:
(1)  the debtor agrees at or before the time of the deferral, refinancing, or
consolidation that the charge may be made;
(2)  the insurance is not required by the creditor as a condition of granting
the deferral, refinancing, or consolidation, unless the insurance is of a type
which the creditor may lawfully require a debtor to obtain in connection with
an extension of credit;
(3)  the terms and conditions of the insurance to be provided comply with all
requirements of this chapter; and
(4)  the debtor receives an appropriate refund or credit on account for any
unexpired term of existing insurance which is duplicated to any degree by the
insurance to be provided in connection with the deferral, refinancing, or
consolidation.
